Florida, session 2026, SB1418.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âSickles High 30 School Ought to be a Law Cosmetic Animal Testing Act of 2026.â 31 Section 2.âPresent subsections (5) through (29) of section 32 499.005, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (6) 33 through (30), respectively, and a new subsection (5) is added to 34 that section, to read: 35 499.005âProhibited acts.âIt is unlawful for a person to 36 perform or cause the performance of any of the following acts in 37 this state: 38 (5)âThe manufacture, repackaging, sale, holding, or 39 offering for sale of cosmetics that have been tested on animals 40 as part of the manufacturing process. 41 Section 3.âSection 499.0095, Florida Statutes, is created 42 to read: 43 499.0095âCosmetics tested on animals prohibited.â 44 (1)(a)âA manufacturer may not use animal testing as part of 45 the process to manufacture cosmetics. 46 (b)âA manufacturer may not repackage, sell, hold, or offer 47 for sale cosmetics that have been tested on animals. 48 (2)âThis section does not apply to the manufacturing of 49 cosmetics, or the repackaging, selling, holding, or offering for 50 sale of cosmetics, if animal testing of such products is: 51 (a)âRequired by federal law. 52 (b)âConducted to comply with the requirements of a foreign 53 regulatory authority or the laws of any foreign country. 54 (c)âConducted for purposes other than cosmetic purposes, 55 and the data collected from such testing is not used to evaluate 56 the safety or effectiveness of cosmetics sold in this state. 57 (3)(a)âA manufacturer, upon issuance of a cosmetic 58 manufacturer permit pursuant to s. 499.01(2)(p), consents to the 59 departmentâs authorized officer or employee entering and 60 inspecting the premises on an annual basis to determine 61 compliance with this section and department rules, as 62 applicable. A refusal to allow an authorized officer or employee 63 of the department to enter the premises or to conduct an 64 inspection is a violation of s. 499.005(7) and is grounds for 65 disciplinary action pursuant to s. 499.066. 66 (b)âBy January 31 of each year, each holder of a cosmetic 67 manufacturer permit issued pursuant to s. 499.01 shall submit to 68 the department written documentation to verify his or her 69 compliance with this section. 70 (4)(a)âA person who violates this section or s. 499.005 71 commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as 72 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 73 (b)âIn addition to the criminal penalties imposed in 74 paragraph (a), a person who violates this section is subject to 75 an administrative penalty of $5,000 for each violation. Each day 76 the violation continues constitutes a separate violation. 77 Penalties collected pursuant to this paragraph are payable to 78 the department to be deposited into the Professional Regulation 79 Trust Fund for the sole purpose of carrying out this section. 80 (c)âIn addition to other penalties, the department may 81 institute such suits or other legal proceedings as are required 82 to enforce this section pursuant to s. 499.066. 83 (5)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 84 section. 85 Section 4.âParagraph (p) of subsection (2), subsection (3), 86 and paragraph (g) of subsection (4) of section 499.01, Florida 87 Statutes, are amended to read: 88 499.01âPermits.â 89 (2)âThe following permits are established: 90 (p)âCosmetic manufacturer permit.âA cosmetic manufacturer 91 permit is required for any person that manufactures or 92 repackages cosmetics in this state. A person that only labels or 93 changes the labeling of a cosmetic but does not open the 94 container sealed by the manufacturer of the product is exempt 95 from obtaining a permit under this paragraph. A person who 96 manufactures cosmetics and has annual gross sales of $25,000 or 97 less is exempt from the permit requirements of this paragraph, 98 unless such person manufacturers cosmetics using animal testing 99 as part of the manufacturing process. Upon request, an exempt 100 cosmetic manufacturer must provide to the department written 101 documentation to verify his or her annual gross sales, including 102 all sales of cosmetic products at any location, regardless of 103 the types of products sold or the number of persons involved in 104 the operation. 105 1.âAn exempt cosmetic manufacturer may only: 106 a.âSell prepackaged cosmetics affixed with a label 107 containing information required by the United States Food and 108 Drug Administration. 109 b.âManufacture and sell cosmetics that are soaps, not 110 otherwise exempt from the definition of cosmetics, lotions, 111 moisturizers, and creams. 112 c.âSell cosmetics that are not adulterated or misbranded in 113 accordance with 21 U.S.C. ss. 361 and 362. 114 d.âSell cosmetic products that are stored on the premises 115 of the cosmetic manufacturing operation. 116 2.âEach unit of cosmetics manufactured under this paragraph 117 must contain, in contrasting color and not less than 10-point 118 type, the following statement: âMade by a manufacturer exempt 119 from Floridaâs cosmetic manufacturing permit requirements.â 120 3.âThe department may investigate any complaint which 121 alleges that an exempt cosmetic manufacturer has violated an 122 applicable provision of this chapter or a rule adopted under 123 this chapter. The departmentâs authorized officer or employee 124 may enter and inspect the premises of an exempt cosmetic 125 manufacturer to determine compliance with this chapter and 126 department rules, as applicable. A refusal to permit an 127 authorized officer or employee of the department to enter the 128 premises or to conduct an inspection is a violation of s. 129 499.005(7) s. 499.005(6) and is grounds for disciplinary action 130 pursuant to s. 499.066. 131 4.âThis paragraph does not exempt any person from any state 132 or federal tax law, rule, regulation, or certificate or from any 133 county or municipal law or ordinance that applies to cosmetic 134 manufacturing. 135 (3)âA nonresident prescription drug manufacturer permit is 136 not required for a manufacturer to distribute a prescription 137 drug active pharmaceutical ingredient that it manufactures to a 138 prescription drug manufacturer permitted in this state intended 139 for research and development and not for resale or human use 140 other than lawful clinical trials and biostudies authorized and 141 regulated by federal law. A manufacturer claiming to be exempt 142 from the permit requirements of this subsection and the 143 prescription drug manufacturer purchasing and receiving the 144 active pharmaceutical ingredient shall comply with the 145 recordkeeping requirements of s. 499.0121(6). The prescription 146 drug manufacturer purchasing and receiving the active 147 pharmaceutical ingredient shall maintain on file a record of the 148 FDA registration number; if available, the out-of-state license, 149 permit, or registration number; and, if available, a copy of the 150 most current FDA inspection report, for all manufacturers from 151 whom they purchase active pharmaceutical ingredients under this 152 section. The failure to comply with the requirements of this 153 subsection, or rules adopted by the department to administer 154 this subsection, for the purchase of prescription drug active 155 pharmaceutical ingredients is a violation of s. 499.005(15) s. 156 499.005(14), and a knowing failure is a violation of s. 157 499.0051(3). 158 (a)âThe immediate package or container of a prescription 159 drug active pharmaceutical ingredient distributed into the state 160 that is intended for research and development under this 161 subsection shall bear a label prominently displaying the 162 statement: âCaution: Research and Development OnlyâNot for 163 Manufacturing, Compounding, or Resale.â 164 (b)âA prescription drug manufacturer that obtains a 165 prescription drug active pharmaceutical ingredient under this 166 subsection for use in clinical trials and or biostudies 167 authorized and regulated by federal law must create and maintain 168 records detailing the specific clinical trials or biostudies for 169 which the prescription drug active pharmaceutical ingredient was 170 obtained. 171 (4) 172 (g)âThe department may adopt rules to administer this 173 subsection which are necessary for the protection of the public 174 health, safety, and welfare. Failure to comply with the 175 requirements of this subsection, or rules adopted by the 176 department to administer this subsection, is a violation of s. 177 499.005(15) s. 499.005(14), and a knowing failure is a violation 178 of s. 499.0051(3). 179 Section 5.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (48) of 180 section 499.003, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 181 499.003âDefinitions of terms used in this part.âAs used in 182 this part, the term: 183 (48)ââWholesale distributionâ means the distribution of a 184 prescription drug to a person other than a consumer or patient, 185 or the receipt of a prescription drug by a person other than the 186 consumer or patient, but does not include: 187 (a)âAny of the following activities, which is not a 188 violation of s. 499.005(22) s. 499.005(21) if such activity is 189 conducted in accordance with s. 499.01(2)(h): 190 1.âThe purchase or other acquisition by a hospital or other 191 health care entity that is a member of a group purchasing 192 organization of a prescription drug for its own use from the 193 group purchasing organization or from other hospitals or health 194 care entities that are members of that organization. 195 2.âThe distribution of a prescription drug or an offer to 196 distribute a prescription drug by a charitable organization 197 described in s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 198 as amended and revised, to a nonprofit affiliate of the 199 organization to the extent otherwise permitted by law. 200 3.âThe distribution of a prescription drug among hospitals 201 or other health care entities that are under common control. For 202 purposes of this subparagraph, âcommon controlâ means the power 203 to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies 204 of a person or an organization, whether by ownership of stock, 205 by voting rights, by contract, or otherwise. 206 4.âThe distribution of a prescription drug from or for any 207 federal, state, or local government agency or any entity 208 eligible to purchase prescription drugs at public health 209 services prices pursuant to Pub. L. No. 102-585, s. 602 to a 210 contract provider or its subcontractor for eligible patients of 211 the agency or entity under the following conditions: 212 a.âThe agency or entity must obtain written authorization 213 for the distribution of a prescription drug under this 214 subparagraph from the Secretary of Business and Professional 215 Regulation or his or her designee. 216 b.âThe contract provider or subcontractor must be 217 authorized by law to administer or dispense prescription drugs. 218 c.âIn the case of a subcontractor, the agency or entity 219 must be a party to and execute the subcontract. 220 d.âThe contract provider and subcontractor must maintain 221 and produce immediately for inspection all records of movement 222 or transfer of all the prescription drugs belonging to the 223 agency or entity, including, but not limited to, the records of 224 receipt and disposition of prescription drugs. Each contractor 225 and subcontractor dispensing or administering these drugs must 226 maintain and produce records documenting the dispensing or 227 administration. Records that are required to be maintained 228 include, but are not limited to, a perpetual inventory itemizing 229 drugs received and drugs dispensed by prescription number or 230 administered by patient identifier, which must be submitted to 231 the agency or entity quarterly. 232 e.âThe contract provider or subcontractor may administer or 233 dispense the prescription drugs only to the eligible patients of 234 the agency or entity or must return the prescription drugs for 235 or to the agency or entity. The contract provider or 236 subcontractor must require proof from each person seeking to 237 fill a prescription or obtain treatment that the person is an 238 eligible patient of the agency or entity and must, at a minimum, 239 maintain a copy of this proof as part of the records of the 240 contractor or subcontractor required under sub-subparagraph d. 241 f.âIn addition to the departmental inspection authority set 242 forth in s. 499.051, the establishment of the contract provider 243 and subcontractor and all records pertaining to prescription 244 drugs subject to this subparagraph shall be subject to 245 inspection by the agency or entity. All records relating to 246 prescription drugs of a manufacturer under this subparagraph 247 shall be subject to audit by the manufacturer of those drugs, 248 without identifying individual patient information. 249 (b)âAny of the following activities, which is not a 250 violation of s. 499.005(22) s. 499.005(21) if such activity is 251 conducted in accordance with rules established by the 252 department: 253 1.âThe distribution of a prescription drug among federal, 254 state, or local government health care entities that are under 255 common control and are authorized to purchase such prescription 256 drug. 257 2.âThe distribution of a prescription drug or offer to 258 distribute a prescription drug for emergency medical reasons, 259 which may include transfers of prescription drugs by a retail 260 pharmacy to another retail pharmacy to alleviate a temporary 261 shortage. For purposes of this subparagraph, a drug shortage not 262 caused by a public health emergency does not constitute an 263 emergency medical reason. 264 3.âThe distribution of a prescription drug acquired by a 265 medical director on behalf of a licensed emergency medical 266 services provider to that emergency medical services provider 267 and its transport vehicles for use in accordance with the 268 providerâs license under chapter 401. 269 4.âThe donation of a prescription drug by a health care 270 entity to a charitable organization that has been granted an 271 exemption under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 272 1986, as amended, and that is authorized to possess prescription 273 drugs. 274 5.âThe distribution of a prescription drug by a person 275 authorized to purchase or receive prescription drugs to a person 276 licensed or permitted to handle reverse distributions or 277 destruction under the laws of the jurisdiction in which the 278 person handling the reverse distribution or destruction receives 279 the drug. 280 6.âThe distribution of a prescription drug by a hospital or 281 other health care entity to a person licensed under this part to 282 repackage prescription drugs for the purpose of repackaging the 283 prescription drug for use by that hospital, or other health care 284 entity and other health care entities that are under common 285 control, if ownership of the prescription drugs remains with the 286 hospital or other health care entity at all times. In addition 287 to the recordkeeping requirements of s. 499.0121(6), the 288 hospital or health care entity that distributes prescription 289 drugs pursuant to this subparagraph must reconcile all drugs 290 distributed and returned and resolve any discrepancies in a 291 timely manner. 292 Section 6.âParagraph (a) of subsection (10) of section 293 499.0051, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 294 499.0051âCriminal acts.â 295 (10)âVIOLATIONS OF S. 499.005 RELATED TO DEVICES AND 296 COSMETICS; DISSEMINATION OF FALSE ADVERTISEMENT.â 297 (a)âAny person who violates any of the provisions of s. 298 499.005 with respect to a device or cosmetic commits a 299 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 300 775.082 or s. 775.083; but, if the violation is committed after 301 a conviction of such person under this subsection has become 302 final, such person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first 303 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083 or as 304 otherwise provided in this part, except that any person who 305 violates s. 499.005(9) or (11) s. 499.005(8) or (10) with 306 respect to a device or cosmetic commits a felony of the third 307 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 308 775.084, or as otherwise provided in this part. 309 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect January 1, 2027.